sv: Medföljande leksaksköksapparater: Kaffebryggare/espressomaskin; Grill/BBQ; Diskmaskin; Fullständigt köksset; Glassmaskin; Vattenkokare; Mikrovågsugn; Mixer/blender; Ugn/spis; Popcornmaskin; Kylskåp/frys; Diskho; Brödrost; Varuautomat/kiosk; Våffeljärn; Övrigt
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia sú aj hračkárske kuchynské spotrebiče: Kávovar/espresso kávovar; Gril/BBQ; Umývačka riadu; Kompletná kuchynská súprava; Zmrzlinovač; Rýchlovarná kanvica; Mikrovlnná rúra; Mixér; Rúra/sporák; Popcornovač; Chladnička/mraznička; Drez; Hriankovač; Predajný/občerstvovací stánok; Vafľovač; Iné
ro-RO: Aparate de bucătărie de jucărie incluse: Cafetieră/espressor; Grătar/BBQ pentru gătit; Mașină de spălat vase; Set complet de bucătărie; Mașină de înghețată; Fierbător; Cuptor cu microunde; Mixer/blender; Cuptor/plită; Aparat de popcorn; Frigider/congelator; Chiuvetă; Prăjitor de pâine; Tonomat/stand de vânzare; Aparat pentru vafe; Altele
zh-TW: 包含玩具廚房家電: 咖啡機/義式咖啡機; 烤肉架/BBQ; 洗碗機; 全套廚具組; 冰淇淋機; 水壺; 微波爐; 攪拌機/果汁機; 烤箱/爐具; 爆米花機; 冰箱/冷凍庫; 水槽; 烤麵包機; 販賣機/小吃攤; 鬆餅機; 其他
hr-HR: Uključene igračke-kuhinjski aparati: Aparat za kavu / espresso; Roštilj; Perilica posuđa; Cijeli kuhinjski set; Aparat za sladoled; Kuhalo za vodu; Mikrovalna pećnica; Mikser/blender; Pećnica/štednjak; Aparat za kokice; Hladnjak/zamrzivač; Sudoper; Toster; Automat za prodaju / štand; Aparat za vafle; Ostalo
it: Utensili della cucina giocattolo inclusi: Caffettiera/macchina per espresso; Griglia/barbecue; Lavastoviglie; Set cucina completo; Macchina per il gelato; Bollitore; Microonde; Frullatore/mixer; Forno/fornello; Macchina per i popcorn; Frigorifero/congelatore; Lavandino; Tostapane; Distributore automatico/chiosco; Macchina per waffle; Altro
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak mutfak aletleri: Kahve/espresso makinesi; Mangal/barbekü; Bulaşık makinesi; Tam mutfak seti; Dondurma makinesi; Su ısıtıcı; Mikrodalga fırın; Mikser/Blender; Fırın/Ocak; Patlamış mısır makinesi; Buzdolabı/Dondurucu; Lavabo; Ekmek kızartma makinesi; Otomat/Satış standı; Waffle makinesi; Diğer
el: Περιλαμβανόμενες συσκευές παιχνιδιού κουζίνας: Καφετιέρα/Μηχανή εσπρέσο; Ψησταριά/Μπάρμπεκιου; Πλυντήριο πιάτων; Πλήρες σετ κουζίνας; Παγωτομηχανή; Βραστήρας; Φούρνος μικροκυμάτων; Μίξερ/Μπλέντερ; Φούρνος/Κουζίνα; Μηχανή ποπ κορν; Ψυγείο/Καταψύκτης; Νεροχύτης; Φρυγανιέρα; Πάγκος πώλησης/Καντίνα; Βαφλιέρα; Άλλο
vi: Bao gồm các dụng cụ nhà bếp đồ chơi.: Máy pha cà phê/Máy pha espresso; Vỉ nướng/BBQ; Máy rửa chén; Bộ bếp đầy đủ; Máy làm kem; Ấm đun nước; Lò vi sóng; Máy trộn/Máy xay sinh tố; Lò nướng/Bếp; Máy làm bắp rang bơ; Tủ lạnh/Tủ đông; Bồn rửa; Máy nướng bánh mì; Quầy bán hàng tự động/Quầy đồ ăn vặt; Máy làm bánh waffle; Khác
nb: Lekekjøkkenapparater inkludert: Kaffetrakter/espressomaskin; Grill; Oppvaskmaskin; Komplett kjøkkensett; Iskremmaskin; Vannkoker; Mikrobølgeovn; Mikser/blender; Stekeovn/komfyr; Popkornmaskin; Kjøleskap/fryser; Vask; Brødrister; Salgsautomat/kiosk; Vaffeljern; Annet
pl: Zabawkowe urządzenia kuchenne w zestawie: Ekspres do kawy; Grill/rożen; Zmywarka; Pełny zestaw kuchenny; Maszynka do lodów; Czajnik; Kuchenka mikrofalowa; Mikser/blender; Piekarnik/kuchenka; Maszynka do popcornu; Lodówka/zamrażarka; Zlew; Toster; Automat z przekąskami/stoisko; Gofrownica; Inne
fi: Sisältyvät lelukeittiölaitteet: Kahvinkeitin/espressokone; Grilli; Astianpesukone; Täysi keittiösetti; Jäätelökone; Vedenkeitin; Mikroaaltouuni; Vatkaaja/tehosekoitin; Uuni/hella; Popcorn-kone; Jääkaappi/pakastin; Tiskiallas; Leivänpaahdin; Myyntikoju; Vohvelirauta; Muu
lt-LT: Įtraukti žaislinės virtuvės prietaisai: Kavos aparatas / espreso aparatas; Kepimo grilis / kepsninė; Indaplovė; Pilnas virtuvės komplektas; Ledų gaminimo aparatas; Virdulys; Mikrobangų krosnelė; Maišytuvas / trintuvas; Orkaitė / viryklė; Kukurūzų spragėsių aparatas; Šaldytuvas / šaldiklis; Kriauklė; Skrudintuvas; Prekybos automatas / kioskas; Vaflinė; Kita
pt-PT: Eletrodomésticos de cozinha de brinquedo incluídos: Máquina de café/máquina de expresso; Grelhador/churrasco; Máquina de lavar loiça; Conjunto de cozinha completo; Máquina de gelados; Chaleira; Micro-ondas; Batedeira/liquidificadora; Forno/fogão; Máquina de pipocas; Frigorífico/congelador; Lava-loiça; Torradeira; Máquina de venda automática/banca de comida; Máquina de waffles; Outro
bg-BG: Включени кухненски уреди в детската кухня: Кафемашина / еспресо машина; Скара за готвене / барбекю; Съдомиялна машина; Пълен кухненски комплект; Машина за сладолед; Чайник; Микровълнова фурна; Миксер/блендер; Фурна/печка; Машина за пуканки; Хладилник/фризер; Мивка; Тостер; Вендинг машина / щанд за закуски; Гофретник; Друго
cs: Obsažené kuchyňské spotřebiče na hraní: Kávovar / espressovač; Gril; Myčka nádobí; Kompletní kuchyňská sestava; Zmrzlinovač; Rychlovarná konvice; Mikrovlnná trouba; Mixér; Trouba/sporák; Popkornovač; Lednička/mraznička; Dřez; Topinkovač; Stánek s občerstvením; Vaflovač; Jiné
de: Enthaltene Spielzeugküchengeräte: Kaffeemaschine/Espressomaschine; Grill/BBQ; Geschirrspüler; Komplettes Küchenset; Eismaschine; Wasserkocher; Mikrowelle; Mixer/Pürierstab; Ofen/Herd; Popcornmaschine; Kühlschrank/Gefrierschrank; Spüle; Toaster; Verkaufsstand; Waffeleisen; Sonstiges
ru: Включенные кухонные приборы игрушечной кухни: Кофеварка/эспрессо-машина; Гриль/барбекю; Посудомоечная машина; Полный кухонный гарнитур; Мороженица; Чайник; Микроволновая печь; Миксер/блендер; Духовка/плита; Аппарат для попкорна; Холодильник/морозильная камера; Раковина; Тостер; Торговый автомат/киоск; Вафельница; Другое
es: Electrodomésticos de juguete incluidos: Cafetera/máquina de espresso; Parrilla/barbacoa; Lavavajillas; Set de cocina completo; Máquina de helados; Hervidor; Microondas; Batidora/licuadora; Horno/estufa; Máquina de palomitas de maíz; Refrigerador/congelador; Fregadero; Tostadora; Máquina expendedora/puesto de comida; Máquina de wafles; Otro
ja: おもちゃのキッチン家電同梱品: コーヒーメーカー / エスプレッソマシン; クッキンググリル / BBQ; 食洗機; フルキッチンセット; アイスクリームメーカー; ケトル; 電子レンジ; ミキサー / ブレンダー; オーブン / ストーブ; ポップコーンメーカー; 冷蔵庫 / 冷凍庫; シンク; トースター; 自動販売機 / 売店; ワッフルメーカー; その他
sl-SI: Vključeni kuhinjski aparati v otroški kuhinji: Aparat za kavo/aparat za espresso; Žar; Pomivalni stroj; Popoln komplet kuhinje; Aparat za sladoled; Grelnik vode; Mikrovalovna pečica; Mešalnik; Pečica/štedilnik; Aparat za kokice; Hladilnik/zamrzovalnik; Pomivalno korito; Opekač; Prodajni avtomat / stojnica; Pekač za vaflje; Drugo
da: Medfølgende legetøjskøkkenapparater: Kaffemaskine/espressomaskine; Grill/BBQ; Opvaskemaskine; Komplet køkkensæt; Ismaskine; Kedel; Mikrobølgeovn; Mikser/blender; Ovn/komfur; Popcornmaskine; Køleskab/fryser; Vask; Brødrister; Salgsautomat/bod; Vaffeljern; Andet
pt-BR: Cozinha de brinquedo eletrodomésticos incluídos: Cafeteira/Máquina de café expresso; Grelha/Churrasqueira; Lava-louças; Conjunto completo de cozinha; Máquina de sorvete; Chaleira; Micro-ondas; Batedeira/Liquidificador; Forno/Fogão; Pipoqueira; Geladeira/Freezer; Pia; Torradeira; Máquina de venda/Quiosque; Máquina de waffle; Outros
th: เครื่องใช้ในครัวของเล่นรวมอยู่ด้วย: เครื่องชงกาแฟ/เครื่องทำเอสเปรสโซ; เตาย่าง/บาร์บีคิว; เครื่องล้างจาน; ชุดครัวครบชุด; เครื่องทำไอศกรีม; กาต้มน้ำ; ไมโครเวฟ; เครื่องผสมอาหาร/เครื่องปั่น; เตาอบ/เตาแก๊ส; เครื่องทำป๊อปคอร์น; ตู้เย็น/ช่องแช่แข็ง; อ่างล้างจาน; เครื่องปิ้งขนมปัง; ตู้จำหน่ายสินค้า/ร้านขายของ; เครื่องทำวาฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
hu: Csomag részét képező játék konyhai gépek: Kávéfőző/Eszpresszógép; Grill/BBQ; Mosogatógép; Teljes konyhakészlet; Fagylaltgép; Vízforraló; Mikrohullámú sütő; Mixer/Turmixgép; Sütő/Tűzhely; Pattogatottkukorica-készítő gép; Hűtőszekrény/Fagyasztó; Mosogató; Kenyérpirító; Játékautomata/Büfé; Goforisütő; Egyéb
en: Toy kitchen appliances included: Coffee maker/Espresso machine; Cooking grill/BBQ; Dishwasher; Full kitchen set; Ice cream maker; Kettle; Microwave; Mixer/Blender; Oven/Stove; Popcorn maker; Refrigerator/Freezer; Sink; Toaster; Vending/Concession stand; Waffle maker; Other
ko: 장난감 주방 가전제품 구성품: 커피 메이커/에스프레소 머신; 요리용 그릴/BBQ; 식기세척기; 전체 주방 세트; 아이스크림 메이커; 주전자; 전자레인지; 믹서/블렌더; 오븐/스토브; 팝콘 메이커; 냉장고/냉동고; 싱크대; 토스터; 자판기/매점; 와플 메이커; 기타
fr: Appareils de cuisine inclus dans la cuisine jouet: Cafetière/machine à expresso; Gril/barbecue; Lave-vaisselle; Ensemble de cuisine complet; Sorbetière; Bouilloire; Micro-ondes; Mixeur/blender; Four/cuisinière; Machine à pop-corn; Réfrigérateur/congélateur; Évier; Grille-pain; Distributeur automatique/stand de concession; Gaufrier; Autre
nl: Speelgoedkeuken meegeleverde apparaten: Koffiezetapparaat/espressomachine; Grill/bbq; Vaatwasser; Volledige keukenset; IJsmachine; Waterkoker; Magnetron; Mixer/blender; Oven/fornuis; Popcornmachine; Koelkast/vriezer; Gootsteen; Broodrooster; Verkoopautomaat/kraampje; Wafelijzer; Overig
zh-CN: 玩具厨房包含电器: 咖啡机/意式咖啡机; 烤架/烧烤炉; 洗碗机; 全套厨房用具; 冰淇淋机; 水壶; 微波炉; 搅拌机/榨汁机; 烤箱/炉灶; 爆米花机; 冰箱/冷柜; 水槽; 烤面包机; 自动售货机/售卖摊位; 华夫饼机; 其他